Louisiana, session 2026, SB189.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2057(A)(3)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2057. Prohibitions; exceptions
A. No person shall:
* * *
(3)(a) Intentionally inject, release, apply, or disperse, by any means,
including by the burning of fuel in an aircraft engine, a chemical, chemical
compound, substance, or apparatus into the atmosphere within the borders of this
state for the express purpose of affecting the temperature, weather, climate, or
intensity of sunlight. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to the injection,
release, or dispersal under one thousand feet above ground level of fire retardant or
fire suppressant substances for purposes of extinguishing or suppressing fire, or to
the aerial application under one thousand feet above ground level of seeds, fertilizers,
or pesticides for agriculture or forestry purposes.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 189 ENROLLED
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.